Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1115.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4020 of Title 56, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Oklahoma Health Care Authority shall increase the Medicaid
rate for mental health services to children, nineteen (19) years of
age or younger, by thirty percent (30%).
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11763 TJ 01/02/25



Req. No. 11763 Page 1